Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
A. In General

§ 17-20-101.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Cooperative Utilities Act”.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 17-20-140(a)(iii).

§ 17-20-102.
Applicability.

This act shall apply to cooperative utilities.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 17-20-140(a)(iii).

§ 17-20-103.
Application of the Wyoming Nonprofit Corporation Act.

Each cooperative utility shall be governed by the provisions of the Wyoming Nonprofit Corporation Act, W.S.

17-19-101

through

17-19-1807

, except insofar as they may be inconsistent with the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 17-20-140(a)(iii).

§ 17-20-104.
Securities Act exemption.

The provisions of chapter 4 of title 17 of the Wyoming statutes shall not apply to any note, bond or other evidence of indebtedness issued by any cooperative utility to the United States or any agency or any instrumentality thereof, to any mortgage or deed of trust executed to secure the same, or to the issuance of membership certificates or proxies by a cooperative utility.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.